Kentucky statutes. TITLE XVII Economic Security and Public Welfare
Fire Protection Sprinkler Contractors

198B.550.
Definitions for KRS 198B.555 to 198B.630.

As used in KRS 198B.555 to 198B.630, unless the context requires otherwise:

“Department” means the Department of Housing, Buildings and Construction;

“Commissioner” means the commissioner of the department;

“Fire protection sprinkler contractor” means a person engaged in the preparation of technical drawings, installation, repair, alteration, extension, maintenance, or inspection of fire protection sprinkler systems and has in his or her employment a certificate holder;

“Fire protection sprinkler contractor’s license” means the license issued by the commissioner to a fire protection sprinkler contractor upon application being approved, fee paid and the satisfactory completion of the requirements of KRS 198B.580. The license shall be issued in the name of the fire protection sprinkler contractor with the name or names of the certificate holder noted thereon;

“Certificate holder” means an individual who has satisfactorily met and the requirements established in KRS 198B.570 and has received a certificate from the commissioner; and

“Fire protection sprinkler system” means a system of piping for which technical drawings have been prepared by or preparation supervised by a certificate holder in accordance with fire protection engineering standards. The system is supplied from a reliable, constant, and sufficient water, gas, or chemical supply, such as a gravity tank, fire pump, reservoir, or pressure tank, or connection by underground piping to a city, county, municipal water district, authorized water main, or both. The sprinkler system is considered the fire protection sprinkler system for purposes of KRS 198B.550 to 198B.630, and is a network of specially sized or hydraulically designed piping and includes installations overhead and underground in a building, structure, or area, and to which sprinklers are connected in systematic pattern. The system includes a controlling valve and a device for actuating an alarm when a system is in operation. The system is usually activated by heat from a fire and causes the discharge of water, gas, or chemical over the fire area. Fire protection sprinkler systems shall include the following types: wet-pipe systems, dry-pipe systems, pre-action systems, deluge systems, combined dry-pipe and pre-action systems, antifreeze systems and circulating closed loop systems, systems utilizing gasses or chemicals, and any other fire suppression system approved by the state fire marshal or the chief building code official of the department.

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 383, § 1, effective July 13, 1984; 1988, ch. 372, § 1, effective July 15, 1988; 2008, ch. 82, § 6, effective July 15, 2008; 2010, ch. 24, § 273, effective July 15, 2010; 2012, ch. 104, § 1, effective January 1, 2013; 2017 ch. 169, § 28, effective June 29, 2017.

198B.555.
Administration of KRS 198B.550 to 198B.630 — Duties of commissioner.

The administration of KRS 198B.550 to 198B.630 is vested in the Department of Housing, Buildings and Construction.

The commissioner shall:

Promulgate reasonable administrative regulations necessary for the administration of KRS 198B.550 to 198B.630;

Set or make reasonable changes in the fees charged for permits, testing, and other aspects of the administration of KRS 198B.550 to 198B.630;

Enforce the provisions of KRS 198B.550 to 198B.630; and

Conduct investigations of complaints and conduct administrative hearings as are required by KRS 198B.620 and 198B.625 and in accordance with KRS Chapter 13B.

The commissioner may:

Secure the advice of the committee with regard to administrative regulations if required by KRS 198B.030(8); and

Have the competency test prepared by a source other than the commissioner.

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 383, § 2, effective July 13, 1984; 1996, ch. 318, § 86, effective July 15, 1996; 2010, ch. 24, § 274, effective July 15, 2010; 2017 ch. 169, § 29, effective June 29, 2017.

198B.560.
Fire protection sprinkler contractor’s license or certificate required — Exemptions.

Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, no person other than a certificate holder or an employee of a certificate holder shall engage in the preparation of technical drawings, installation, repair, alteration, extension, maintenance or inspection of a fire protection sprinkler system or use any title, sign, card or device indicating, or intending to indicate, or represent in any manner that he is a certified fire protection sprinkler contractor without first obtaining the fire protection sprinkler contractor’s license or certificate under the provisions of KRS 198B.570 or 198B.580; it being the purpose of KRS 198B.550 to 198B.630 to safeguard life, health, property, and welfare of the public.

KRS 198B.550 to 198B.630 shall not apply to state or local building officials, fire marshals, fire inspectors, or insurance inspectors when acting in their official capacities.

This chapter shall not apply to professional engineers in the preparation of plans or construction inspection pursuant to KRS Chapter 322.

This chapter shall not apply to limited area sprinkler systems served by a domestic water supply consisting of ten (10) sprinkler heads or less in one (1) structure.

History.
Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 383, § 3, effective July 13, 1984; 2008, ch. 82, § 2, effective July 15, 2008; 2012, ch. 104, § 2, effective January 1, 2013.

198B.565.
Preparation of designs of system.

The design for any fire protection sprinkler system for buildings and structures shall be prepared by a licensed professional engineer or, if the licensed, professional engineer chooses not to prepare the design, a licensed fire protection sprinkler contractor whose certificate holder is a certified engineering technician, NICET Level III or Level IV, may prepare the design.

When a fire protection sprinkler system is designed by a professional engineer in accordance with subsection (1) of this section, the licensed fire protection sprinkler contractor shall submit to the professional engineer, for his approval, technical drawings and, when required, hydraulic calculations for the installation of the fire protection sprinkler system. Such technical drawings, after approved by the professional engineer, shall be submitted by the professional engineer to the department , the insurance authority having jurisdiction, if any, and other authority when required by Kentucky law.

When a fire protection sprinkler system is designed by a licensed fire protection sprinkler contractor in accordance with subsection (1) of this section, the licensed fire protection sprinkler contractor shall submit the design and detailed plans to the department, the insurance authority having jurisdiction, if any, and other authority when required by Kentucky law.

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 383, § 4, effective July 13, 1984; 1988, ch. 396, § 1, effective July 15, 1988; 2010, ch. 24, § 275, effective July 15, 2010; 2017 ch. 169, § 30, effective June 29, 2017.

198B.570.
Examination of applicant.

To become a certificate holder under KRS 198B.560, an applicant shall satisfactorily pass a current examination prescribed and administered by the National Institute for Certification in Engineering Technologies entitled Fire Protection Engineering Technology Automatic Sprinkler System Design Level III, or the equivalent thereof, approved by the commissioner.

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 383, § 5, effective July 13, 1984; 2008, ch. 82, § 7, effective July 15, 2008; 2010, ch. 24, § 276, effective July 15, 2010; 2017 ch. 169, § 31, effective June 29, 2017.

198B.575.
Affidavits in lieu of examination. [Repealed.]

198B.580.
Prerequisites to becoming licensed fire protection sprinkler contractor.

To become a licensed fire protection sprinkler contractor under KRS 198B.560, a person shall:

Have in his or her employ a certificate holder;

Comply with the minimum insurance requirements established by KRS 198B.595; and

Make application to the commissioner for a license and pay the fees required.

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 383, § 7, effective July 13, 1984; 2010, ch. 24, § 277, effective July 15, 2010; 2017 ch. 169, § 32, effective June 29, 2017.

198B.585.
Seal of certificate holder.

Each certificate holder engaged in the activity described in KRS 198B.560 shall secure a seal with the design prescribed by regulation of the commissioner.

All working drawings, specifications, and plans prepared by, or under the supervision of the certificate holder, shall bear the imprint of this seal and shall bear the imprint of the seal of the licensed fire protection contractor.

No certificate holder shall assign or affix his or her seal to any drawings, specifications or plans which have not been prepared under his or her immediate supervision, and no licensed fire protection contractor shall affix his or her seal to any drawings, specifications, or plans unless the drawings, specifications, or plans were prepared by an employee certificate holder as required by KRS 198B.560 and 198B.580.

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 383, § 8, effective July 13, 1984; 2010, ch. 24, § 278, effective July 15, 2010; 2017 ch. 169, § 33, effective June 29, 2017.

198B.590.
Signature on license and certificate.

The license and certificate shall be signed by the commissioner.

History.
Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 383, § 9, effective July 13, 1984; 2010, ch. 24, § 279, effective July 15, 2010.

198B.595.
Proof of liability and workers’ compensation insurance coverage.

The commissioner shall not issue a license under KRS 198B.560 and 198B.580, unless the fire protection sprinkler contractor applicant files with the commissioner proof of liability insurance coverage of not less than two hundred and fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) one person/maximum and five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) one accident/maximum and workers’ compensation insurance as provided for in KRS Chapter 342.

The workers’ compensation insurance required by this section shall be in the form of certificate of insurance executed by an insurer authorized to do business in this state. The liability insurance required by this section shall be liability insurance that covers the legal liability of the licensed person as the result of erroneous acts or failure to act in his or her capacity as a fire protection sprinkler contractor or system designer and shall be in the form of certificate of insurance executed by an insurer authorized to do business in this state or exported by a licensed surplus lines broker to an eligible carrier pursuant to KRS 304.10-020 to 304.10-210. Insurance certificates filed with the commissioner under this section shall remain in force until the insurer has terminated future liability by a thirty (30) day notice to the commissioner.

Failure to maintain the insurance required hereunder shall constitute grounds for denial, suspension, or revocation of a license under KRS 198B.620 by the commissioner.

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 383, § 10, effective July 13, 1984; 2002, ch. 101, § 1, effective July 15, 2002; 2005, ch. 182, § 6, effective June 20, 2005; 2010, ch. 24, § 280, effective July 15, 2010; 2017 ch. 169, § 34, effective June 29, 2017.

198B.600.
Certificate holder permitted to obtain only one contractor’s license at a time.

A certificate holder shall not obtain a fire protection sprinkler contractor’s license for more than one (1) fire protection sprinkler contractor at a time. If the certificate holder leaves the employment of the fire protection sprinkler contractor, he or she shall notify the commissioner within thirty (30) days. The certificate holder shall not be eligible to obtain a fire protection sprinkler contractor’s license for more than one (1) other fire protection sprinkler contractor for a period of twelve (12) months thereafter. If the certificate holder leaves the employment of the fire protection sprinkler contractor, or dies, the contractor shall have six (6) months or until the expiration of the current license, whichever shall last occur, to submit a new application on another certificate holder and be issued a new license. If the application is not received and a new license issued within the allotted time, the commissioner shall revoke the license of the fire protection sprinkler contractor.

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 383, § 11, effective July 13, 1984; 2010, ch. 24, § 281, effective July 15, 2010; 2017 ch. 169, § 35, effective June 29, 2017.

198B.605.
Annual renewal of certificates and licenses.

All certificates issued under KRS 198B.570 shall expire on the last day of the certificate holder’s birth month in the following year. The department may reduce the license fee on a pro rata basis for initial certificates issued for less than twelve (12) months. Renewed certificates shall expire on the last day of the certificate holder’s birth month of each year after the date of issuance of the renewed certificate. Application for a renewal shall be upon a form prescribed by the commissioner, and the certificate holder shall furnish the information required by the form.
(1) (a)

All certificates issued under KRS 198B.570 shall expire on the last day of the certificate holder’s birth month in the following year. The department may reduce the license fee on a pro rata basis for initial certificates issued for less than twelve (12) months. Renewed certificates shall expire on the last day of the certificate holder’s birth month of each year after the date of issuance of the renewed certificate. Application for a renewal shall be upon a form prescribed by the commissioner, and the certificate holder shall furnish the information required by the form.

Failure of any certificate holder to secure his or her renewal certificate within sixty (60) days after the last day of the certificate holder’s birth month shall constitute sufficient cause for the commissioner to revoke his or her license.

The commissioner may restore a certificate that has been revoked for failure to pay the renewal fee, upon the receipt of payment of all delinquent fees.

A certificate holder may voluntarily surrender his or her certificate to the commissioner and thereby be relieved of the annual renewal fee. After surrendering a certificate, he or she shall not be known as a certificate holder and shall desist from the practice thereof. Within five (5) years from the time of surrender of the certificate, he or she may again qualify for a certificate without examination by the payment of the required fee. If five (5) years thereafter have lapsed, he or she shall return to the status of a new applicant.

The initial license for a fire protection sprinkler contractor shall expire on the last day of the licensee’s birth month in the following year. The department may reduce the license fee on a pro rata basis for initial licenses issued for less than twelve (12) months. Renewed licenses shall expire on the last day of the licensee’s birth month of each year after the date of issuance of the renewed license. Application for a renewal shall be upon a form prescribed by the commissioner and the license holder shall furnish the information required by the form.
(3) (a)

The initial license for a fire protection sprinkler contractor shall expire on the last day of the licensee’s birth month in the following year. The department may reduce the license fee on a pro rata basis for initial licenses issued for less than twelve (12) months. Renewed licenses shall expire on the last day of the licensee’s birth month of each year after the date of issuance of the renewed license. Application for a renewal shall be upon a form prescribed by the commissioner and the license holder shall furnish the information required by the form.

Failure of any certificate holder to secure a renewal certificate within sixty (60) days after the last day of the certificate holder’s birth month shall constitute sufficient cause for the commissioner to revoke the license.

The commissioner may restore a license that has been revoked for failure to pay the renewal fee, upon the receipt of payment of all delinquent fees.

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 383, § 12, effective July 13, 1984; 2005, ch. 182, § 1, effective June 20, 2005; 2008, ch. 82, § 8, effective July 15, 2008; 2010, ch. 24, § 282, effective July 15, 2010; 2017 ch. 169, § 36, effective June 29, 2017.

198B.610.
License as proof of competency — Power of local officials regarding regulation.

If a licensed fire protection sprinkler contractor desires to do business in any part of the state, he or she shall deliver to the local building official a copy of his or her fire protection sprinkler contractor’s license and comply with KRS 198B.560 and 198B.565. The local building official shall require a copy of the license before issuing a license or building license, and no local official shall impose any other competency requirements on the licensed fire protection sprinkler contractor.

Nothing in KRS 198B.560 and 198B.565 shall limit the power of a city, urban-county government, county, or state to regulate the quality and character of work performed by contractors, through a system of permits, fees and inspections which are designed to assure compliance with, and aid in the implementation of state and local building laws or to enforce other local laws for the protection of the public health and safety. Nothing in KRS 198B.560 and 198B.565 shall limit the power of a city, urban-county government, county, or the state to adopt any system of permits requiring submission to and approval by the city, urban-county government, county, or the state of plans and specifications for work to be performed by contractors before commencement of the work. The official authorized to issue building or other related permits shall ascertain that the fire protection sprinkler contractor is duly licensed by requiring evidence of a valid fire protection sprinkler contractor’s license as a prerequisite to that contractor beginning design, installation, repair, alteration, extension, maintenance, or inspection of fire protection sprinkler systems.

KRS 198B.560 and 198B.565 shall apply to any fire protection sprinkler contractor performing work for any city, urban-county government, special district, county, or the state. Officials of any city, urban-county government, special district, county, or the state shall determine compliance with KRS 198B.560 and 198B.565 before awarding any contracts for the installation, repair, alteration, addition, or inspection of a fire protection sprinkler system. Bids for such work shall be accompanied by a copy of a valid fire protection sprinkler contractor’s license.

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 383, § 13, effective July 13, 1984; 2008, ch. 82, § 3, effective July 15, 2008; 2017 ch. 169, § 37, effective June 29, 2017.

198B.615.
Disposition of fees collected by commissioner.

All license and certificate fees and charges collected by the commissioner under the provisions of KRS 198B.550 to 198B.630 and the rules and regulations of the commissioner adopted hereunder, shall be paid to the State Treasury and credited to a trust and agency fund to be used by the commissioner’s office in carrying out the provisions of KRS 198B.550 to 198B.630. Any money in the trust and agency fund at the end of the fiscal year shall lapse to the general fund of the Commonwealth.

History.
Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 383, § 14, effective July 13, 1984; 2010, ch. 24, § 283, effective July 15, 2010.

198B.620.
Refusal to renew license — Revocation or suspension of license — Appeal — Criminal penalty.

Subject to a hearing conducted in accordance with KRS Chapter 13B, the commissioner may refuse to renew or may suspend or revoke the license of a licensed fire protection sprinkler contractor or the certificate of a certificate holder to engage in the business of fire protection sprinkler systems or in lieu thereof assess an administrative fine not to exceed two thousand dollars ($2,000) for any of the following reasons:

Gross incompetency or gross negligence in the installation, repair, alteration, maintenance, inspection, or addition to fire protection sprinkler systems, as determined by the commissioner;

Conviction of a felony;

Fraudulent or dishonest practices while engaging in the business of fire protection sprinkler systems;

Use of false evidence or misrepresentation in an application for a license or certificate;

Signing or affixing his or her seal to any plans, prints, specifications or reports, which have not been prepared by him or her personally or under his or her immediate supervision, or in violation of KRS 198B.585; or

Knowingly violating any provisions of KRS 198B.550 to 198B.630 or the regulations issued thereunder.

The commissioner shall revoke, subject to a hearing in accordance with KRS Chapter 13B, the license of a fire protection sprinkler contractor or a certificate holder who engages in the fire protection sprinkler system business during a suspension of the license.

Any person who engages in the drawings, installation, repair, alteration, extension, maintenance, or inspection of fire protection sprinkler systems or uses any title, sign, card, or device indicating or intending to indicate that he or she is a certified fire sprinkler contractor without having first obtained the requisite license or certificate shall be guilty of a Class A misdemeanor. Each violation shall be regarded as a separate offense.

Any license or certificate holder who is aggrieved by a final order of the commissioner suspending or revoking a license may appeal to the Franklin Circuit Court or the Circuit Court of the county of the license or certificate holder’s place of business in accordance with KRS Chapter 13B.

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 383, § 15, effective July 13, 1984; 1996, ch. 318, § 87, effective July 15, 1996; 2008, ch. 82, § 4, effective July 15, 2008; 2010, ch. 24, § 284, effective July 15, 2010; 2017 ch. 169, § 38, effective June 29, 2017.

198B.625.
Injunction — Cease and desist order.

Whenever, in the judgment of the commissioner, any person has engaged, or is about to engage, in any acts or practices that constitute, or will constitute a violation of the provisions of KRS 198B.560 and 198B.565, the commissioner may inform the Attorney General, who may make application to the Circuit Court of the county where the violation occurred for an order enjoining such acts or practices.

If a person is practicing without the requisite license or certificate required under KRS 198B.560 and 198B.565, the commissioner shall inform the Attorney General of the unlawful practice within seven (7) days of receiving notice of its occurrence. The Attorney General may apply to the Circuit Court of the county where the violation occurred for an order enjoining the acts or practices.

Additionally, the commissioner may issue a cease and desist order, the violation of which shall be cause for the imposition of an administrative fine, suspension, or revocation as provided for in KRS 198B.620. Upon showing via the commissioner that such person has engaged, or is about to engage, in any such acts or practices, an injunction or restraining order, or such other order as may be appropriate, shall be granted by the Circuit Court. Any order of the Circuit Court of the county where the violation occurred shall be enforceable and shall be valid anywhere in this Commonwealth and the order of that court shall be reviewable as provided for in the Rules of Civil Procedure, in the case of other injunctions and restraining orders.

History.
Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 383, § 16, effective July 13, 1984; 2008, ch. 82, § 5, effective July 15, 2008; 2010, ch. 24, § 285, effective July 15, 2010.

198B.630.
Application of KRS 198B.550 to 198B.630.

The provisions of KRS 198B.550 to 198B.630 shall apply to the preparation of technical drawings, installation, repair, alteration, extension, maintenance or inspection of fire protection sprinkler systems other statutes notwithstanding.

History.
Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 383, § 17, effective July 13, 1984.